Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
CHAPTER 11 Transportation of Hazardous Materials

Editor’s notes.

The provisions of this chapter were enacted by both Ga. L. 1985, p. 469, § 2 and Ga. L. 1985, p. 1499, § 2 (which Acts enacted identical language) and were derived from former Article 7 of Chapter 6 of Title 32 (§§

32-6-220

through 32-6-225), which article was repealed by Ga. L. 1985, p. 469, § 1 and by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1499, § 1. Both Acts became effective July 1, 1985. The provisions of this chapter are being treated as amendments to the provisions of the former article for historical-citation and amendment-note purposes.

Ga. L. 1985, p. 469, § 3 and Ga. L. 1985, p. 1499, § 3 neither of which was codified by the General Assembly, both provided as follows:

“(a) It is the intention of the General Assembly that the Public Service Commission replace the Department of Transportation as the responsible state agency to regulate and enforce the laws of this state relating to the transportation of hazardous materials.

“(b) All actions and investigations pending in the Department of Transportation pursuant to former Article 7 of Chapter 6 of Title 32 on June 30, 1985, and all books, papers, and records attaching to such actions and investigations are transferred to the Public Service Commission effective July 1, 1985.

“(c) All rules and regulations promulgated by the Department of Transportation pursuant to former Article 7 of Chapter 6 of Title 32 prior to July 1, 1985, shall remain in full force and effect until amended or repealed by the Public Service Commission.”

By resolution (Ga. L. 1985, p. 853), the General Assembly created the Hazardous Materials Emergency Response Advisory Council to study activities related to hazardous material, chemical, or waste transportation and storage or spills. The resolution required the council to make a report of its findings on or before December 31, 1986, on which date the council would stand abolished.

46-11-1 through 46-11-6.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1979, p. 789, §§ 1-6; Code 1981, §§

32-6-220

—32-6-225; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 32; Code 1981, §§

46-11-1

—46-11-6 enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 469, § 2; Code 1981, §§

46-11-1

—46-11-6 enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1499, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 951, § 10-1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, §§ 28-7—28-11/HB 501; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; repealed by Ga. L. 2011, p. 479, § 25/HB 112, effective July 1, 2011.

Code Commission notes.

Code Section 46-11-4 was repealed effective July 1, 2011, by operation of Ga. L. 2011, p. 479, § 25. However, Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3(110), effective July 1, 2011, purported to amend the former Code section to substitute “Department of Public Health” for “Department of Community Health”. For effect of subsequent amendment of a repealed statute, see Lampkin v. Pike,

115 Ga. 827

(1902).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 479, § 25/HB 112 repealed and reserved this chapter, effective July 1, 2011.